Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.131

Requested inspections—Fee for service—Disbursements in lieu of fee.

To facilitate the movement or sale of forest, agricultural, floricultural, horticultural and related products, or bees and related products, the director may provide, if requested by farmers, growers, or other interested persons, special inspections, pest identifications, plant identifications, plant diagnostic services, pest control activities, other special certifications and activities not otherwise authorized by statute and prescribe a fee for that service. The fee shall, as closely as practical, cover the cost of the service rendered, including the salaries and expenses of the personnel involved. Moneys collected shall be deposited in the plant pest account, which is hereby created within the agricultural local fund. No appropriation is required for disbursement from the plant pest account to provide the services authorized by this section. In lieu of a fee, assessments and other funds deposited in the plant pest account may be disbursed to provide the services authorized by this section.

[ 1997 c 227 s 2; 1991 c 257 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 227: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 26, 1997]." [ 1997 c 227 s 3.]